Hawaii, session 2026, SB3036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 45, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending section 4 to read as follows: "SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval, and shall apply to bond proceeds expended by a county after December 31, 2023[, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028; provided that section 46-15.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day before the effective date of this Act.]; provided that the amendments made to section 46-15.1 by section 2 of this Act shall not be repealed when that section is reenacted on: (1)  July 1, 2030, pursuant to: (A)  Section 3 of Act 141, Session Laws of Hawaii 2009, as amended by section 3 of Act 102, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015, as amended by section 1 of Act 80, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019, as amended by section 2 of Act 90, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023; and (B)  Section 3 of Act 98, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, as amended by section 4 of Act 102, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, as amended by section 50 of Act 55, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, as amended by section 2 of Act 80, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019, as amended by section 3 of Act 90, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023; and (2)  July 1, 2031, pursuant to section 4 of Act 31, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________